Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Additional Conservation Surcharge on Oil.

Sec. 43.55.300.
Surcharge levied.

Every producer of oil shall pay a surcharge of $.04 per barrel of oil produced from each lease or property in the state, less any oil the ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation.

The surcharge imposed by (a) of this section is in addition to the tax imposed by AS

43.55.011

and is due on the last day of the month on oil produced from each lease or property during the preceding month. The surcharge is in addition to the surcharge imposed by AS

43.55.201

—

43.55.231

.

A producer of oil shall make a report of production on March 31 of the year following the calendar year of production and in the same manner and under the same penalties as required under AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

.

Oil not considered under AS

43.55.020(e)

to be produced from a lease or property is not considered to be produced from a lease or property for purposes of this section.

History.

(§ 17 ch 128 SLA 1994; am §§ 28, 29 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Sec. 43.55.310.
Use of revenue derived from surcharge.

The legislature may appropriate the annual estimated balance of the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

for deposits into the general fund of the proceeds of the surcharge levied under AS

43.55.300

to the oil and hazardous substance release prevention account in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund established by AS

46.08.010

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 128 SLA 1994)